Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.5052

Definition of "Indian"—Rule making. (Expires December 1, 2030.)

(1) The department must consult, and obtain the advice and consent of, the governing bodies of the state's federally recognized tribes in developing an agreed-upon definition of the term "Indian" for the purposes of RCW 43.216.505 and, by July 1, 2024, must adopt the definition in rule.

(2) This section expires December 1, 2030.

[ 2021 c 199 s 207.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 199 ss 204-208: See note following RCW 43.216.513.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.